Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202545-729
Issuance of mortgage loan originator license; director; findings required; denial; notice; appeal; application deemed abandoned; when; effect.

(1) The director shall not issue a mortgage loan originator license unless the director makes at a minimum the following findings:

(a) The applicant has never had a mortgage loan originator license revoked in any governmental jurisdiction, except that a subsequent formal vacation of such revocation shall not be deemed a revocation;

(b) The applicant has not been convicted of, or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere or its equivalent to, in a domestic, foreign, or military court:

(i) A misdemeanor under any state or federal law which involves dishonesty or fraud or which involves any aspect of the business of a mortgage banker, depository institution, or installment loan company unless such individual has received a pardon for such conviction or such conviction has been expunged, except that the director may consider the underlying crime, facts, and circumstances of a pardoned or expunged conviction in determining the applicant's eligibility for a license pursuant to subdivision (c) of this subsection; or

(ii) Any felony under state or federal law unless such individual has received a pardon for such conviction or such conviction has been expunged, except that the director may consider the underlying crime, facts, and circumstances of a pardoned or expunged conviction in determining the applicant's eligibility for a license pursuant to subdivision (c) of this subsection;

(c) The applicant has demonstrated financial responsibility, character, and general fitness such as to command the confidence of the community and to warrant a determination that the mortgage loan originator will operate honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the purposes of the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act. For purposes of this subsection, an individual has shown that he or she is not financially responsible when he or she has shown a disregard in the management of his or her own financial condition. The director may consider the following factors in making a determination as to financial responsibility:

(i) The applicant's current outstanding judgments except judgments solely as a result of medical expenses;

(ii) The applicant's current outstanding tax liens or other government liens and filings;

(iii) The applicant's foreclosures within the past three years; and

(iv) A pattern of seriously delinquent accounts within the past three years by the applicant;

(d) The applicant has completed the prelicensing education requirements described in section 45-730;

(e) The applicant has passed a written test that meets the test requirement described in section 45-731; and

(f) The applicant is covered by a surety bond as required pursuant to section 45-724 or a supplemental surety bond as required pursuant to section 45-338.

(2)(a) If the director determines that a mortgage loan originator license application should be denied, the director shall notify the applicant in writing of the denial and of the reasons for the denial.

(b) The director shall not deny an application for a mortgage loan originator license because of the failure to submit information required under the act or rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act without first giving the applicant an opportunity to correct the deficiency by supplying the missing information.

(c) If an applicant for a mortgage loan originator license does not complete his or her license application and fails to respond to a notice or notices from the department to correct the deficiency or deficiencies for a period of one hundred twenty days or more after the date the department sends the initial notice after initial filing of the application, the department may deem the application as abandoned and may issue a notice of abandonment of the application to the applicant in lieu of proceedings to deny the application.

(d) A decision of the director denying a mortgage loan originator license application pursuant to the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act may be appealed. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department.

(3) A mortgage loan originator license shall not be assignable.

Laws 2009, LB328, § 14;

Laws 2012, LB965, § 15;

Laws 2013, LB290, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 105.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.